California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
Whenever any person confined in any state institution subject to the jurisdiction of the Youth Authority dies, and any personal funds or property of such person remains in the hands of the Director of the Youth Authority, and no demand is made upon said director by the owner of the funds or property or his legally appointed representative, all money and other personal property of such decedent remaining in the custody or possession of the Director of the Youth Authority shall be held by him for a period of one year from the date of death of the decedent, for the benefit of the heirs, legatees, or successors in interest of such decedent.

Upon the expiration of said one-year period, any money remaining unclaimed in the custody or possession of the director shall be delivered by him to the State Treasurer for deposit in the Unclaimed Property Fund under the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 6 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

Upon the expiration of said one-year period, all personal property and documents of the decedent, other than cash, remaining unclaimed in the custody or possession of the director shall be disposed of as follows:

(a) All deeds, contracts or assignments shall be filed by the director with the public administrator of the county of commitment of the decedent;

(b) All other personal property shall be sold by the director at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, and the proceeds of the sale delivered by him to the State Treasurer in the same manner as is herein provided with respect to unclaimed money of the decedent. If he deems it expedient to do so, the director may accumulate the property of several decedents and sell the property in such lots as he may determine, provided that he makes a determination as to each decedent’s share of the proceeds;

(c) If any personal property of the decedent is not salable at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, or if it has no intrinsic value, or if its value is not sufficient to justify the deposit of such property in the State Treasury, the director may order it destroyed;

(d) All other unclaimed personal property of the decedent not disposed of as provided in paragraphs (a), (b), or (c) hereof, shall be delivered by the director to the State Controller for deposit in the State Treasury under the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 6 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1962.)
-------------------------------------------

1016.

(a) Whenever a person confined in a state institution subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, escapes, or is discharged or paroled from the institution, and any personal funds or property of that person remains in the hands of the Director of the Division of Juvenile Justice in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, and no demand is made upon the director by the owner of the funds or property or his or her legally appointed representative, all money and other intangible personal property of that person, other than deeds, contracts, or assignments, remaining in the custody or possession of the director shall be held by him or her for a period of three years from the
 date of that escape, discharge, or parole, for the benefit of the person or his or her successors in interest. However, unclaimed personal funds or property of paroled minors may be exempted from the provisions of this section during the period of their minority and for a period of one year thereafter, at the discretion of the director.

(b) Upon the expiration of this three-year period, any money and other intangible personal property, other than deeds, contracts or assignments, remaining unclaimed in the custody or possession of the director shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) Upon the expiration of one year from the date of the escape, discharge, or parole:

(1) All deeds, contracts, or assignments shall be filed by
 the director with the public administrator of the county of commitment of that person.

(2) All tangible personal property other than money, remaining unclaimed in his or her custody or possession, shall be sold by the director at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, and the proceeds of the sale shall be held by him or her subject to the provisions of Section 1752.8 of this code, and subject to the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If he or she deems it expedient to do so, the director may accumulate the property of several inmates and may sell the property in lots as he or she may determine, provided that he or she makes a determination as to each inmate’s share of the proceeds.

(d) If any tangible personal property covered by this section is not salable at public auction or upon a sealed-bid basis,
 or if it has no intrinsic value, or if its value is not sufficient to justify its retention by the director to be offered for sale at public auction or upon a sealed-bid basis at a later date, the director may order it destroyed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 90.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1017.

Before any money or other personal property or documents are delivered to the State Treasurer, State Controller, or public administrator, or sold at auction or upon a sealed-bid basis, or destroyed, under the provisions of Section 1015, and before any personal property or documents are delivered to the public administrator, or sold at auction or upon a sealed-bid basis, or destroyed, under the provisions of Section 1016, of this code, notice of said intended disposition shall be posted at least 30 days prior to the disposition, in a public place at the institution where the disposition is to be made, and a copy of such notice shall be mailed to the last known address of the owner or deceased owner, at least 30 days prior to such disposition. The notice prescribed by this section need not specifically describe each item of property to be disposed of.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1962.)
-------------------------------------------

1018.

At the time of delivering any money or other personal property to the State Treasurer or State Controller under the provisions of Section 1015 or of Chapter 7 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the director shall deliver to the State Controller a schedule setting forth a statement and description of all money and other personal property delivered, and the name and last known address of the owner or deceased owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1962.)
-------------------------------------------

1019.

When any personal property has been destroyed as provided in Section 1015 or 1016, no suit shall thereafter be maintained by any person against the State or any officer thereof for or on account of such property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1020.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provisions of Sections 1015 and 1016 shall apply (1) to all money and other personal property delivered to the State Treasurer or State Controller prior to the effective date of said sections, which would have been subject to the provisions thereof if they had been in effect on the date of such delivery; and (2) to all money and personal property delivered to the State Treasurer or State Controller prior to the effective date of the 1961 amendments to said sections, as said provisions would have applied on the date of such delivery if, on said date of delivery, the provisions of Chapter 1809, Statutes of 1959, had not been in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1962.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Superintendents [1049. - 1050.]

1049.

Subject to the provisions of law relating to the State civil service, the Youth Authority may appoint, define the duties, and fix the salary of the superintendent or executive officer of each institution under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.

The superintendent of the institutions under this chapter shall be persons of high moral character, specially qualified for the position.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1129.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Employees [1075. - 1078.]

1075.

The Youth Authority shall, in accordance with law, appoint all officers and employees required at the institutions under this chapter, and shall fix their remuneration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

1076.

The superintendent, assistant superintendent, supervisor, or any employee having custody of wards, of each institution of the Department of the Youth Authority, and any transportation officer of the Department of the Youth Authority, shall have the powers and authority of peace officers listed in Section 830.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 645.)
-------------------------------------------

1077.

(a) Any psychologist employed by or who contracts with the Department of the Youth Authority to provide services to wards under the jurisdiction of the department shall be licensed to practice in this state.

(b) Any psychologist employed by the department on July 1, 1999, shall be exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a), as long as he or she continues employment with the department in the same class.

(c) The requirements of subdivision (a) may be waived in order for a person to gain qualifying expertise for licensure as a psychologist in this state in accordance with Section 1277 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 659, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1078.

To the extent that funding is available, the department, in consultation with the State Department of State Hospitals, shall develop training in the treatment of children and adolescents for mental health disorders and shall provide training to all appropriate mental health professionals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 58.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Conduct, Education, and Discipline [1120. - 1125.5.]

1120.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to insure an appropriate educational program for wards committed to the Department of the Youth Authority. The objective of the program shall be to improve the academic, vocational, and life survival skills of each ward so as to enable these wards to return to the community as productive citizens.

(b) The department shall assess the educational needs of each ward upon commitment and at least annually thereafter until released on parole. The initial assessment shall include a projection of the academic, vocational, and psychological needs of the ward and shall be used both in making a determination as to the appropriate educational program for the ward and as a measure of progress in subsequent assessments of the educational development of the ward.

The educational program of the department shall be responsive to the needs of all wards, including those who are educationally handicapped or limited-English-speaking wards.

(c) The statewide educational program of the department shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following courses of instruction:

(1) Academic preparation in the areas of verbal communication skills, reading, writing, and arithmetic.

(2) Vocational preparation including vocational counseling, training in marketable skills, and job placement assistance.

(3) Life survival skills, including preparation in the areas of consumer economics, family life, and personal and social adjustment.

All of the aforementioned courses of instruction shall be offered at each institution within the jurisdiction of the department except camps and those institutions whose primary function is the initial reception and classification of wards. At such camps and institutions the educational program shall take into consideration the purpose and function of the camp and institutional program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 209.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1120.1.

(a) In furtherance of the purpose of the Department of the Youth Authority to protect society from the consequences of criminal activity, the department’s educational programs shall focus on value-based character education, emphasizing curriculum leading to a crime-free lifestyle. In furtherance of this goal, the department shall establish the office of the Superintendent of Education. The Superintendent of Education shall oversee educational programs under the jurisdiction of the department.

(b) The department shall ensure that each ward who has not attained a high school diploma or equivalent shall be enrolled in an appropriate educational program as deemed necessary by the department.

(c) The department shall develop a high school graduation plan for every ward identified pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 996, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1120.2.

(a) There is in the Department of the Youth Authority a correctional education authority for the purpose of carrying out the education and training of wards committed to the youth authority.

(b) The course of study for wards attending any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, shall include those courses specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 51220) of Chapter 2 of Part 28 of the Education Code. The course of study shall meet the model curriculum standards adopted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to Section 51226 of the Education Code.

(c) (1) The correctional education authority shall adopt standards of proficiency in basic skills for wards attending a course of study for any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive.

(2) Differential standards and assessment procedures may be adopted for wards for whom an individualized education program has been developed and for whom the regular instructional program has been modified or for wards who have been diagnosed with a learning handicap or disability.

(d) The correctional education authority may issue diplomas of graduation from high school to wards who have completed the required course of study and meet the standards of proficiency in basic skills adopted by the correctional education authority. The authority may also administer to wards the general educational development tests that have been approved by the State Board of Education.

(e) For purposes of receiving federal funds, the correctional education authority shall be deemed a local educational agency.

(f) For purposes of receiving state funds pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution in accordance with the definitions set forth in Section 41202 of the Education Code, the correctional education authority shall be deemed a state agency and shall only be entitled to state funding for direct instructional services provided to wards attending a course of study. The correctional education authority may not receive state funds unless the funds are specifically appropriated to the Department of the Youth Authority for direct instructional services, and may not receive additional funds from the State Department of Education under any other program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 78, Sec. 59.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1120.5.

At each institution under this chapter the Youth Authority shall organize and maintain a division of instruction and such other divisions as it deems necessary and advisable in the conduct of the school.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1120 by Stats. 1979, Ch. 981.)
-------------------------------------------

1121.

The chief of each such division of instruction shall be well trained in modern school administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 183.)
-------------------------------------------

1122.

Such divisions of instruction shall have jurisdiction over all courses of instruction. Such courses shall include academic and vocational training, and shall be subject to the approval of the State Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1634.)
-------------------------------------------

1123.

Subject to the availability of adequate state funding for these purposes, the Director of the Youth Authority shall provide all wards at each penal institution within the jurisdiction of the department, including camps, with information about behavior that places a person at high risk for contracting the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), and about the prevention of transmission of acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS). The director shall provide all wards, who are within one month of release or being placed on parole, with information about agencies and facilities that provide testing, counseling, medical, and support services for AIDS victims. Information about AIDS prevention shall be solicited by the director from the State Department of Health Services, the county health officer, or local agencies providing services to persons with AIDS. The Director of Health Services, or his or her designee, shall approve protocols pertaining to the information to be disseminated, and the training to be provided, under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1301, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1124.

Each institution under this chapter may manufacture, repair, and assemble products or may raise produce, for use in the institution or in any other State institution or for sale to or pursuant to contract with the public. The primary purpose of all instruction, discipline and industries shall be to benefit the inmates of the several schools and to qualify them for honorable employment and good citizenship. Moneys received from sales or contracts made or entered into under this section shall be used first to defray the expenses of the industry, including wages paid to the wards working in the industry. The wages shall be set by the director. Moneys in excess of those used to support the industry shall be deposited in the “Benefit Fund” as defined in Section 1752.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 540, Sec. 7.   Effective September 17, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

1125.

Each inmate of an institution under this chapter shall be permitted to keep for his own use all articles of handiwork and other finished products suitable primarily for personal use, as determined by the director, which have been fabricated by the inmate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

1125.5.

When any public road is a principal means of access to the Preston School of Industry the Department of the Youth Authority, with the consent of the Department of Finance, may arrange with the California Highway Commission or the board of supervisors of the county in which the road is located for the employment of the inmates of the school in the improvement or maintenance of the road, under supervision of the officers of the school and without compensation to the inmates so employed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 58.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Escapes [1152. - 1155.]

1152.

(a) Any person who without the use of force or violence willfully assists any parolee of the Department of the Youth Authority whose parole has been revoked, any escapee, any ward confined to a Department of the Youth Authority institution or facility, or who is being transported to or from that institution or facility, or any person in the lawful custody of any officer or person to escape or in an attempt to escape from a Department of the Youth Authority institution or facility, or custody, is guilty of a misdemeanor. 

(b) Any person who with the use of force or violence willfully assists any parolee of the Department of the Youth Authority whose parole has been revoked, any escapee, any ward confined to a Department of the Youth Authority institution or facility, or who is being transported to or from that institution or facility, or any person in the lawful custody of any officer or person to escape or in an attempt to escape from a Department of the Youth Authority institution or facility, or custody, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for a term of 16 months, two, or three years or in the county jail for a term not exceeding one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1154.

Whenever any person who has escaped from any institution or facility under the jurisdiction of the Youth Authority is returned by a sheriff or probation officer, the sheriff or probation officer shall be paid the same fees and expenses as are allowed such officers by law for the transportation of persons to institutions or facilities under the jurisdiction of the Youth Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

1155.

The person in charge of any secure detention facility, including, but not limited to, a prison, a juvenile hall, a county jail, or any institution under the jurisdiction of the California Youth Authority, shall promptly notify the chief of police of the city in which the facility is located, or the sheriff of the county if the facility is located in an unincorporated area, of an escape by a person in its custody. The person in charge of any secure detention facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections or the Youth Authority shall release the name of, and any descriptive information about, any person who has escaped from custody to other law enforcement agencies or to other persons if the release of the information would be necessary to assist in recapturing the person or would be necessary to protect the public from substantial physical harm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 359, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Paroles and Dismissals [1176. - 1180.]

1176.

When, in the opinion of the Youth Authority Board, any person committed to or confined in any such school deserves parole according to regulations established for the purpose, and it will be to his or her advantage to be paroled, the board may grant parole under conditions it deems best. A reputable home or place of employment shall be provided for each person so paroled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 6.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1177.

(a) Pursuant to Section 1178, if a person discharged from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities by the Board of Juvenile Hearings has proven that person’s ability to desist from criminal behavior and to initiate a successful transition into adulthood, the board may grant that person an honorable discharge.

(b) The purposes of an honorable discharge are to recognize and reward youth who have avoided reoffending and have pursued productive and engaged roles as members of society; to remove barriers to a youth’s successful integration into society and to enable the pursuit of greater opportunities; to serve as an incentive for
 youth to participate in treatment and training while placed in the Division of Juvenile Facilities; to connect youth with resources and opportunities upon their reentry into the community; and to inspire and motivate youth committed to the Division of Juvenile Facilities to plan and pursue a positive life.

(c) When determining whether to grant an honorable discharge to a person who petitions the board pursuant to Section 1178, the board shall consider, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(1) The petitioner’s offense history, if any, while the petitioner was under the jurisdiction of the Division of Juvenile Facilities, or during or after completion of local probation supervision.

(2) Efforts made by the petitioner
 toward successful community reintegration, including employment history, educational achievements or progress toward obtaining a degree, vocational training, volunteer work, community engagement, positive peer and familial relationships, and any other relevant indicators of successful reentry and rehabilitation.

(d) The board shall promulgate regulations setting forth the criteria for the award of an honorable discharge.

(e) The board shall promote the purposes of an honorable discharge designation and communicate the success of recipients of honorable discharge to youth currently committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities.

(f) The board shall inform youth about the
 opportunity to earn an honorable discharge at initial case reviews, annual reviews, and discharge consideration hearings.

(g) The board may collaborate with public, private, and nonprofit organizations to assist youth in the fulfillment of the criteria described in subdivision (d) and in the completion of a petition for an honorable discharge.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 683, Sec. 3.   (SB 625)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1178.

(a) A person previously committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities may petition the Board of Juvenile Hearings for an honorable discharge upon his or her completion of local probation supervision following discharge, but not sooner than 18 months following the date of discharge, by the board.

(b) Commencing on or after July 1, 2018, a person housed at the Division of Juvenile Facilities pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 1731.5 or Section 1731.7 may petition the Board of Juvenile Hearings for an honorable discharge upon his or her completion of parole or local probation supervision following release, but not
 sooner than 18 months following the date of release.

(c) (1) The county of commitment shall inform youth currently or previously under its supervision, who were previously under the jurisdiction of the division, about the opportunity and process of petitioning the board for an honorable discharge.

(2) The county of commitment shall send a letter regarding the opportunity and process of petitioning the board for an honorable discharge to the last known residence of a person previously under the supervision of the county of commitment.

(d) Upon receiving a petition for an honorable discharge, the board shall request of the county of commitment, and the county of commitment shall provide, a summary report of the petitioner’s performance while on probation after release from the Division of Juvenile Facilities.

(e) The Division of Juvenile Facilities shall promulgate regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 32.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1179.

(a) Each person honorably discharged by the Board of Juvenile Hearings shall thereafter be released from all penalties or disabilities resulting from the offenses for which the person was committed, including, but not limited to, penalties or disabilities that affect access to education, employment, or occupational licenses. However, a release from all penalties and disabilities shall not affect a person’s duty to register pursuant to Section 290.008 of the Penal Code. A person in receipt of an honorable discharge is not eligible for appointment as a peace officer employed by any public agency if that person’s appointment is otherwise prohibited by Section 1029 of the Government Code.

(b) Persons who receive an honorable discharge and who petition the court for relief otherwise provided for by law may cite and the court shall recognize receipt of an honorable discharge as evidence of rehabilitation.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person may be appointed and employed as a peace officer by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities if (1) at least five years have passed since that person’s honorable discharge, and the person has had no misdemeanor or felony convictions except for traffic misdemeanors since the person was honorably discharged by the board, or (2) the person was employed as a peace officer by the department on or before January 1, 1983. A person who is under the jurisdiction of the Division of Juvenile
 Facilities or a county probation department shall not be admitted to an examination for a peace officer position with the Division of Juvenile Facilities unless and until the person has been honorably discharged from the jurisdiction of the Division of Juvenile Facilities pursuant to Sections 1177 and 1719.

(d) In the case of a person granted an honorable discharge, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities shall immediately certify the discharge or dismissal in writing, and shall transmit the certificate to the committing court and the Department of Justice. The court shall thereupon dismiss the accusation and the action pending against that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 683, Sec. 6.   (SB 625)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.

The Department of the Youth Authority shall provide, within 10 days, upon request to the chief of police of a city or the sheriff of a county information available to the department, including actual, glossy photographs, no smaller than 318 x 318 inches in size, and, in conjunction with the Department of Justice, fingerprints concerning persons then on parole who are or may be residing or temporarily domiciled in that city or county.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 196, Sec. 10) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 600, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Finances [1200. - 1201.]

1200.

The Controller of the State shall, on requisition of any of the institutions under this chapter, duly audited by him, draw his warrant on the State Treasurer for any moneys duly appropriated to pay for the necessary expenditures in the establishment and maintenance of such school, and the State Treasurer shall pay the same from the appropriations provided therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 481.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

For each person committed to any state school the county from which he was committed shall make payments to the state as provided in Section 911 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 605.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. The California Youth Training School [1250. - 1258.]

1250.

There is hereby established an institution for the confinement of males under the custody of the Director of Corrections and the Youth Authority to be known as the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 555, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1251.

The Heman G. Stark Youth Training School shall be an intermediate security type institution. Its primary purpose shall be to provide custody, care, industrial, vocational and other training, guidance and reformatory help for young men, too mature to be benefited by the programs of correctional schools for juveniles and too immature in crime for confinement in prisons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1252.

There may be transferred to and confined in the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School any male subject to the custody, control and discipline of the Youth Authority, whom the Youth Authority believes will be benefited by confinement in such an institution. Whenever by reason of any law governing the commitment of a person to the Youth Authority or to an institution under the jurisdiction of the Youth Authority such a person is deemed not to be a person convicted of a crime, the transfer or placement of such a person in the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School shall not affect the status or rights of the person and shall not be deemed to constitute a conviction of a crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 555, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1253.

The Youth Authority shall make rules and regulations for the government of the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School and the management of its affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1254.

The Youth Authority shall appoint, subject to civil service, a superintendent for the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School, and such officers and employees as may be necessary, and shall fix their compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 555, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1255.

The Youth Authority shall construct and equip, in accordance with law, suitable buildings, structures, and facilities for the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 555, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1256.

The Youth Authority shall have the same powers, duties, and responsibilities in respect to the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School and the persons confined therein that the Youth Authority has in respect to institutions established for persons committed to the Youth Authority under Division 2.5 of this code and in respect to such persons, except that the Youth Authority shall have no power to parole, discharge, grant leave of absence to, or otherwise release from the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School any person under the custody of the Director of Corrections and transferred to and confined in the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School, or to transfer any such person from the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School to any other institution whatever, except to return him to the custody of the Director of Corrections.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the provisions of Part 3 of the Penal Code continue to apply to all persons in the custody of the Director of Corrections who are transferred by the Adult Authority to the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School, so far as such provisions may be applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 555, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1258.

The Director of the Youth Authority, in connection with industrial training at the Heman G. Stark Youth Training School, Chino, California, may provide suitable materials and facilities for use by persons confined in the school in the construction of houses which can be moved which, upon their completion, shall be sold to the public upon competitive bids. Proceeds derived from the sale of any such house shall be deposited in the General Fund. Construction shall be limited to not more than one each calendar year and the size shall not exceed one thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) square feet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 555, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. The Interstate Compact for Juveniles [1400. - 1402.]

1400.

THE INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR JUVENILES

 ARTICLE IPURPOSE

 

The compacting states to this Interstate Compact recognize that each state is responsible for the proper supervision or return of juveniles, delinquents, and status offenders who are on probation or parole and who have absconded, escaped, or run away from supervision and control and in so doing have endangered their own safety and the safety of others. The compacting states also recognize that each state is responsible for the safe return of juveniles who have run away from home and in
 doing so have left their state of residence. The compacting states also recognize that Congress, by enacting the Crime Control Act (4 U.S.C. Sec. 112), has authorized and encouraged compacts for cooperative efforts and mutual assistance in the prevention of crime.

It is the purpose of this compact, through means of joint and cooperative action among the compacting states to: (a) ensure that the adjudicated juveniles and status offenders subject to this compact are provided adequate supervision and services in the receiving state as ordered by the adjudicating judge or parole authority in the sending state; (b) ensure that the public safety interests of the citizens, including the victims of juvenile offenders, in both the sending and receiving states are adequately protected; (c) return juveniles who have run away, absconded, or escaped from supervision or control or have been accused of an offense to the state requesting their return; (d) make contracts for the
 cooperative institutionalization in public facilities in member states for delinquent youth needing special services; (e) provide for the effective tracking and supervision of juveniles; (f) equitably allocate the costs, benefits, and obligations of the compacting states; (g) establish procedures to manage the movement between states of juvenile offenders released to the community under the jurisdiction of courts, juvenile departments, or any other criminal or juvenile justice agency which has jurisdiction over juvenile offenders; (h) insure immediate notice to jurisdictions where defined offenders are authorized to travel or to relocate across state lines; (i) establish procedures to resolve pending charges (detainers) against juvenile offenders prior to transfer or release to the community under the terms of this compact; (j) establish a system of uniform data collection on information pertaining to juveniles subject to this compact that allows access by authorized juvenile justice and criminal justice
 officials, and regular reporting of compact activities to heads of state executive, judicial, and legislative branches and juvenile and criminal justice administrators; (k) monitor compliance with rules governing interstate movement of juveniles and initiate interventions to address and correct noncompliance; (l) coordinate training and education regarding the regulation of interstate movement of juveniles for officials involved in such activity; and (m) coordinate the implementation and operation of the compact with the Interstate Compact for the Placement of Children, the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, and other compacts affecting juveniles particularly in those cases where concurrent or overlapping supervision issues arise. It is the policy of the compacting states that the activities conducted by the Interstate Commission created herein are the formation of public policies and therefore are public business. Furthermore, the compacting states shall cooperate and observe their
 individual and collective duties and responsibilities for the prompt return and acceptance of juveniles subject to the provisions of this compact. The provisions of this compact shall be reasonably and liberally construed to accomplish the purposes and policies of the compact.

 ARTICLE IIDEFINITIONS

 

As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires a different construction:

(a) “Bylaws” means those bylaws established by the Interstate Commission for its governance, or for directing or controlling its actions or conduct.

(b) “Compact Administrator” means the individual in each